Massachusetts, session 194th, H189.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 4 of chapter 94G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after the word “data”, in line 234, the following words:- ; 
provided, however, that the commission shall review every billboard or other large public facing 
advertisement and approve the imagery, size, location, font size, size of the required disclaimers 
and any other element of such advertisements as determined by the commission.